Indiana, session 2026, SB167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-23-20-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) As used in this section, "excluded city" has the
meaning set forth in IC 36-7-1-6.5.
(b) As used in this section, "relocate" means to:
(1) remove all of the above ground portions of an existing
outdoor advertising sign; and
(2) construct a new outdoor advertising sign.
(c) As used in this section, "zoning authority" means any
agency, officer, board, or commission of:
(1) a county having a consolidated city; or
(2) an excluded city, as provided in IC 36-7-4-201;
that may issue a permit or an approval with respect to land use or
the construction of an outdoor advertising sign.
(d) Notwithstanding any state or federal law and except as
provided in subsections (e) and (f), the department or a zoning
authority may not apply zoning standards or require a permit to
SB 167—LS 6711/DI 153


relocate an outdoor advertising sign if all of the following apply:
(1) The advertising space of the new outdoor advertising sign
is equal to the advertising space of the existing outdoor
advertising sign, measured by total square footage.
(2) The location of the new outdoor advertising sign is:
(A) within:
(i) the market area (as defined in section 25.6(a) of this
chapter); and
(ii) six hundred sixty (660) feet of a highway, street, or
road; and
(B) zoned to allow any commercial or industrial activity.
(3) The new outdoor advertising sign conforms to the
standards of:
(A) size;
(B) lighting; and
(C) spacing between signs as designated for the interstate
system and limited access facilities;
as set forth in rules adopted by the department under the
provisions of an agreement under section 1 of this chapter.
(4) The relocation will not result in the upgrade of an outdoor
advertising sign to an electronic billboard.
This subsection applies regardless of whether the new outdoor
advertising sign would be constructed with the same or new
components or in the same configuration or an alternative
configuration.
(e) An existing outdoor advertising sign located within the
boundaries of an excluded city may not be relocated outside the
excluded city unless the county or municipality to which the
outdoor advertising sign will be relocated approves of the
relocation.
(f) A zoning authority may require:
(1) a permit; or
(2) an inspection;
to relocate an outdoor advertising sign if the purpose is to ensure
compliance with national codes or rules adopted by the fire
prevention and building safety commission under IC 22-13-2-2.
However, if the zoning authority does not issue a permit decision
within thirty (30) days of receiving an application, the permit is
granted.
SB 167—LS 6711/DI 153


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Homeland Security and
Transportation, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 167, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 15, after "state" insert "or federal".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 167 as introduced.)
CRIDER, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 1.
SB 167—LS 6711/DI 153